Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-285
Provider, defined.

Provider means any person who provides an electronic communication service and who has authorized access to or possession or control of the facilities or equipment necessary to implement (1) the order to intercept a wire or electronic communication or (2) the order to install a pen register or a trap-and-trace device.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 147.